ja: ポケットタイプ: バックポケット; カーゴポケット; ハンドポケット; 隠しポケット; メッシュポケット; ポケットなし; セキュリティポケット; サイドポケット; ジッパー付きポケット; その他
hu: Zseb típusa: Farzsebek; Oldalzsebek; Kézmelegítő zsebek; Rejtett zsebek; Hálós zsebek; Zseb nélküli; Biztonsági zsebek; Oldalzsebek; Cipzáras zsebek; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta žepa: Zadnji žepi; Kargo žepi; Žepi za roke; Skriti žepi; Mrežasti žepi; Brez žepov; Varnostni žepi; Stranski žepi; Žepi z zadrgo; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ vrecka: Zadné vrecká; Kapsáčové vrecká; Vrecká na ruky; Skryté vrecká; Sieťovinové vrecká; Bez vreciek; Bezpečnostné vrecká; Bočné vrecká; Vrecká na zips; Iné
ko: 포켓 유형: 백 포켓; 카고 포켓; 핸드 포켓; 히든 포켓; 메시 포켓; 포켓 없음; 시큐리티 포켓; 사이드 포켓; 지퍼 포켓; 기타
sv: Typ av ficka: Bakfickor; Cargofickor; Handfickor; Dolda fickor; Nätfickor; Inga fickor; Säkerhetsfickor; Sidofickor; Fickor med dragkedja; Övrigt
th: แบบพกพา: กระเป๋าหลัง; กระเป๋าคาร์โก้; กระเป๋าซุกมือ; กระเป๋าซ่อน; กระเป๋าตาข่าย; ไม่มีกระเป๋า; กระเป๋านิรภัย; กระเป๋าข้าง; กระเป๋าแบบมีซิป; อื่นๆ
cs: Kapesní typ: Zadní kapsy; Kapsáčové kapsy (cargo); Přední kapsy na ruce; Skryté kapsy; Síťované kapsy; Bez kapes; Bezpečnostní kapsy; Boční kapsy; Kapsy na zip; Jiné
nl: Zaktype: Achterzakken; Cargozakken; Steekzakken; Verborgen zakken; Mesh-zakken; Geen zakken; Veiligheidszakken; Zijzakken; Ritszakken; Overig
zh-TW: 口袋類型: 後口袋; 工作口袋; 插手口袋; 隱藏口袋; 網布口袋; 無口袋; 防盜口袋; 側口袋; 拉鍊口袋; 其他
el: Τύπου τσέπης: Πίσω τσέπες; Τσέπες cargo; Τσέπες χεριών; Κρυφές τσέπες; Τσέπες από δίχτυ; Χωρίς τσέπες; Τσέπες ασφαλείας; Πλαϊνές τσέπες; Τσέπες με φερμουάρ; Άλλο
es: Tipo de bolsillo: Bolsillos traseros; Bolsillos tipo cargo; Bolsillos para manos; Bolsillos ocultos; Bolsillos de malla; Sin bolsillos; Bolsillos de seguridad; Bolsillos laterales; Bolsillos con cierre; Otro
bg-BG: Тип джоб: Задни джобове; Карго джобове; Джобове за ръце; Скрити джобове; Мрежести джобове; Без джобове; Тайни джобове; Странични джобове; Джобове с цип; Други
it: Tipo di tasca: Tasche posteriori; Tasche cargo; Tasche scaldamani; Tasche nascoste; Tasche in mesh; Senza tasche; Tasche di sicurezza; Tasche laterali; Tasche con zip; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de bolso: Bolsos traseiros; Bolsos cargo; Bolsos para as mãos; Bolsos ocultos; Bolsos em malha; Sem bolsos; Bolsos de segurança; Bolsos laterais; Bolsos com fecho de correr; Outros
pt-BR: Bolso, tipo: Bolsos traseiros; Bolsos cargo; Bolsos para mãos; Bolsos ocultos; Bolsos de malha; Sem bolsos; Bolsos de segurança; Bolsos laterais; Bolsos com zíper; Outro
pl: Typ łuzy: Kieszenie tylne; Kieszenie cargo; Kieszenie boczne; Ukryte kieszenie; Kieszenie z siateczki; Brak kieszeni; Bezpieczne kieszenie; Kieszenie boczne; Kieszenie na zamek; Inne
fi: Taskun tyyppi: Takataskut; Reisitaskut; Käsitaskut; Piilotaskut; Verkkotaskut; Ei taskuja; Turvataskut; Sivutaskut; Vetoketjutaskut; Muu
vi: Loại túi: Túi sau; Túi hộp; Túi xỏ tay; Túi ẩn; Túi lưới; Không có túi; Túi an toàn; Túi bên hông; Túi có khóa kéo; Khác
da: Lommetype: Baglommer; Cargolommer; Stiklommer; Skjulte lommer; Mesh-lommer; Ingen lommer; Sikkerhedslommer; Sidelommer; Lommer med lynlås; Andet
lt-LT: Kišenės tipas: Galinės kišenės; Cargo kišenės; Kišenės rankoms; Paslėptos kišenės; Tinklinės kišenės; Be kišenių; Apsauginės kišenės; Šoninės kišenės; Kišenės su užtrauktukais; Kita
zh-CN: 口袋类型: 后袋; 工装口袋; 插手袋; 隐藏式口袋; 网眼口袋; 无口袋; 防盗口袋; 侧袋; 拉链口袋; 其他
en: Pocket type: Back pockets; Cargo pockets; Hand pockets; Hidden pockets; Mesh pockets; No pockets; Security pockets; Side pockets; Zippered pockets; Other
tr: Cep tipi: Arka cepler; Kargo cepleri; El cepleri; Gizli cepler; File cepler; Cep yok; Güvenlik cepleri; Yan cepler; Fermuarlı cepler; Diğer
ru: Тип кармана: Задние карманы; Карманы карго; Карманы для рук; Скрытые карманы; Сетчатые карманы; Без карманов; Потайные карманы; Боковые карманы; Карманы на молнии; Другое
de: Taschenart: Gesäßtaschen; Cargotaschen; Eingrifftaschen; Versteckte Taschen; Mesh-Taschen; Keine Taschen; Sicherheitstaschen; Seitentaschen; Reißverschlusstaschen; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta džepa: Stražnji džepovi; Cargo džepovi; Džepovi za ruke; Skriveni džepovi; Mrežasti džepovi; Bez džepova; Sigurnosni džepovi; Bočni džepovi; Džepovi s patentnim zatvaračem; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tip de buzunar: Buzunare la spate; Buzunare cargo; Buzunare pentru mâini; Buzunare ascunse; Buzunare din plasă; Fără buzunare; Buzunare de siguranță; Buzunare laterale; Buzunare cu fermoar; Altele
nb: Lommetype: Baklommer; Cargolommer; Håndlommer; Skjulte lommer; Nettinglommer; Ingen lommer; Sikkerhetslommer; Sidelommer; Lommer med glidelås; Annet
fr: Type de poche: Poches arrière; Poches cargo; Poches repose-mains; Poches dissimulées; Poches en maille; Sans poches; Poches de sécurité; Poches latérales; Poches zippées; Autre